Utah statutes.
7-23-301.   Posting of fee schedules for cashing checks.

(1)  A check casher shall post a complete schedule of all fees for cashing a check in a conspicuous location on its premises that can be viewed by a person cashing a check.

(2)  The schedule of fees required to be posted under Subsection (1) shall state the fees using dollar amounts.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 96, 2008 General Session

